New York, session 2025-2026, S1925.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature finds that the cost of 2 design of public transit projects for the metropolitan transportation 3 authority far exceed national and global competitors. The metropolitan 4 transportation authority's fiscal performance on recent major projects 5 has severely limited further investment in maintaining, modernizing, and 6 expanding transit service. It is imperative that public transit is oper- 7 ated in a manner which delivers quality service to riders at an afforda- 8 ble cost. While it is important to minimize service disruptions, the 9 current process of stopping and starting work ends up extending the 10 period of construction, and cost taxpayers millions in additional labor 11 costs. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to direct that the 12 work done on transit projects for the metropolitan transportation 13 authority be done on a continual basis until such project has been 14 completed. 15 § 2. Section 1266-c of the public authorities law is amended by adding 16 a new subdivision 16 to read as follows: 17 16. In the design, construction, maintenance, or renovation of any 18 transit facility, transportation facility, or equipment as defined under 19 section twelve hundred or twelve hundred sixty-one of this chapter, work 20 shall take place over a continuous period of time until such point at 21 which the project has been completed. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 23 it shall have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed three 24 years after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03487-01-5